src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-siom_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - siõm a-stem: # Noun 'rifle' - full paradigm
     siõm+N+Sg+Nom: siõm
     siõm+N+Sg+Gen: siõmˈmân
     siõm+N+Sg+Acc: siõmˈmân
     siõm+N+Sg+Ill: siõmˈmna
     siõm+N+Sg+Loc: siõmˈmnest
     siõm+N+Sg+Com: siõmˈmnin
     siõm+N+Ess: siõmˈmnen
     siõm+N+Par: siõmˈmned
     siõm+N+Sg+Abe: [siõmˈmântaa, siõmˈmântää]
     siõm+N+Pl+Nom: siõmˈmân
     siõm+N+Pl+Gen: siõmˈmni
     siõm+N+Pl+Acc: siõmˈmnid
     siõm+N+Pl+Ill: siõmˈmnid
     siõm+N+Pl+Loc: siõmˈmnin
     siõm+N+Pl+Com: siõmˈmnivuiʹm
     siõm+N+Pl+Abe: [siõmˈmnitaa, siõmˈmnitää]
